Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2925.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 45.0135, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Authorization. (a) The commissioner may appoint peace officers, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), and establish a law enforcement agency, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), known as the Commerce Fraud Bureau, to conduct investigations, and to make arrests under sections 629.30 and 629.34. The primary jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency is limited to offenses with a nexus to insurance-related crimes or financial crimes. (b) Upon request and at the commissioner's discretion, the Commerce Fraud Bureau may respond to a law enforcement agency's request to exercise law enforcement duties in cooperation with the law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the particular matter. (c) The Commerce Fraud Bureau must allocate at least 70 percent of its work to insurance fraud, as defined in sections 60A.951, subdivision 4, and 609.611. new text begin (d) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the commissioner of commerce is responsible for the functions, programs, personnel, powers, responsibilities, duties, and oversight of the Commerce Fraud Bureau. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 65B.84, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Oversight. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the commissioner of commerce is responsible for the functions, programs, personnel, powers, responsibilities, duties, and oversight of the automobile theft prevention program. new text end